Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3923
Transitional provision.

(1) The Nebraska
Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act applies
to guardianship and protective proceedings begun on or after January 1, 2012.

(2) Sections
30-3901 to 30-3906 and 30-3916 to 30-3923 apply to proceedings begun before
January 1, 2012, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order
has been issued.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 27.